Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1852
Real property taxes; books and records; certified copies; presumptive evidence.

The books and records belonging to the offices of the county clerk and county treasurer, or copies thereof properly certified, shall be presumptive evidence of the sale of any real property for taxes, the redemption thereof, or the payment of taxes thereon.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 227, p. 473;

R.S.1913, § 6555;

C.S.1922, § 6083;

C.S.1929, § 77-2035;

R.S.1943, § 77-1852.